sl-SI: Struktura ohišja: Trdo; Poltrdo; Mehko; Drugo
zh-TW: 盒子結構: 硬質; 半硬質; 軟質; 其他
fi: Kotelon rakenne: Kova; Puolijäykkä; Pehmeä; Muu
ro-RO: Structura carcasei: Rigidă; Semirigidă; Moale; Altele
ja: ケース構造: ハード; セミリジッド; ソフト; その他
nb: Eske-struktur: Hard; Halvstiv; Myk; Annet
nl: Koffer structuur: Hard; Halfhard; Zacht; Overige
pl: Konstrukcja futerału: Twarda; Półsztywna; Miękka; Inne
el: Δομή θήκης: Σκληρό; Ημίσκληρο; Μαλακό; Άλλο
pt-PT: Estrutura da caixa: Dura; Semirrígida; Macia; Outra
hr-HR: Struktura kutije: Tvrdo; Polukruto; Meko; Ostalo
vi: Cấu trúc hộp đựng: Cứng; Bán cứng; Mềm; Khác
hu: Tok szerkezete: Kemény; Félmerev; Puha; Egyéb
en: Case structure: Hard; Semi-rigid; Soft; Other
sv: Fodralstruktur: Hård; Halvstyv; Mjuk; Annat
tr: Kılıf yapısı: Sert; Yarı sert; Yumuşak; Diğer
ko: 케이스 구조: 하드; 반경질; 소프트; 기타
ru: Конструкция кейса: Жесткая; Полужесткая; Мягкая; Другое
cs: Konstrukce pouzdra: Tvrdé; Polotuhé; Měkké; Jiné
pt-BR: Estrutura da caixa/estojo: Rígido; Semirrígido; Flexível; Outro
it: struttura cassa: Rigida; Semirigida; Morbida; Altro
th: โครงสร้างตัวเคส: แข็ง; กึ่งแข็ง; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Štruktúra puzdra: Tvrdé; Polotuhé; Mäkké; Iná
de: Kofferkonstruktion: Hart; Halbsteif; Weich; Sonstige
fr: Structure de l’étui: Rigide; Semi-rigide; Souple; Autre
zh-CN: 收纳盒结构: 硬质; 半硬质; 软质; 其他
bg-BG: Конструкция на калъфа: Твърда; Полутвърда; Мека; Друго
da: Kassestruktur: Hård; Halvstiv; Blød; Andet
lt-LT: Dėklo konstrukcija: Kietas; Pusiau kietas; Minkštas; Kita
es: Estructura del estuche: Rígido; Semirrígido; Blando; Otro